District of Columbia statutes.
47-857.15

Tax abatements for nonprofit organizations locating in emerging commercial neighborhoods — Abatement caps.

(a)

The total annual dollar amount of tax abatements approved for an Eligible Nonprofit Zone shall not exceed:

(1)

$600,000 in the Anacostia Nonprofit Zone;

(2)

$2.6 million in the Capitol Riverfront Nonprofit Zone;

(3)

$800,000 in all Designated Nonprofit Zones;

(4)

$600,000 in the Minnesota-Benning Nonprofit Zone;

(5)

$1.2 million in the Mount Vernon Triangle Nonprofit Zone; and

(6)

$2.6 million in the NoMa Nonprofit Zone.

(b)

The total amount of real property tax abatements approved for qualified nonprofit organizations in all Eligible Nonprofit Zones shall not exceed $500,000 in Fiscal Years 2011, 2012, 2013, and 2014.

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 7042(b), 57 DCR 6242
This section is referenced in § 47-857.12 and § 47-857.13.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 7042(b) of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).